incubator/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ابپتثچجحخديذرزژسشصضطظعغقکگلىمنهیئونكفهؤپءٔآ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>  
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>   
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>  
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>  

    <sdef n="acc"    c="Accusative"/>  

    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>  
    <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>  

    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>  
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="pve"    c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"    c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent"   c="Sentence limit"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
     <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[۰۱۲۳۴۵۶۷۸۹]+([.,][۰۱۲۳۴۵۶۷۸۹]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__را">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ﺭﺍ</l>
          <r><j/>ﺭﺍ<s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>را</l>
          <r><j/>را<s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>را</l>
          <r><j/>را<s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺩﺭ__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هنوز__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="و__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="تاجیکستان__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- entry without ZWNJ analyse only -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ایل__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ات</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فرشت/ه__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>گان</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کﺕ/ﺎﺑ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ﺎﺑ</l>
          <r>ﺎﺑ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- kitābhā is regular plural -->
      <!-- with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ﺎﺑ‌ها</l>
          <r>ﺎﺑ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ابها</l>
          <r>اب<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- Arabic plural is also used in Persian -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ب</l>
          <r>اب<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="شعر__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ا</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دختر__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ﺎﻧ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ان</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="رباعی__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ات</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ماهی__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ان</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ستار/ه__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه‌ها</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>گان</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مل/ت__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ت</l>
          <r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ل</l>
          <r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="P__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->
    <pardef n="بزرگ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- entradas without ZWNJ analyse only -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="و"><i>و</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="اندر"><i>اندر</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="از"><i>از</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="با"><i>با</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="بر"><i>بر</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="برای"><i>برای</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="به"><i>به</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="بی"><i>بی</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="چون"><i>چون</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="در"><i>در</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="مثل"><i>مثل</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="تا"><i>تا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="همچون"><i>همچون</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="کتاب"><i>کﺕ</i><par n="کﺕ/ﺎﺑ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دختر"><i>دختر</i><par n="دختر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ازدواج"><i>ازدواج</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پناهنده"><i>پناهند</i><par n="فرشت/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ملت"><i>مل</i><par n="مل/ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ملخ"><i>ملخ</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پدر"><i>پدر</i><par n="دختر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فرشته"><i>فرشت</i><par n="فرشت/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="یهودی"><i>یهودی</i><par n="دختر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خوابگاه"><i>خوابگاه</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="وزیر"><i>وزیر</i><par n="دختر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جانور"><i>جانور</i><par n="دختر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رباعی"><i>رباعی</i><par n="رباعی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ستاره"><i>ستار</i><par n="ستار/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هندو"><i>هندو</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بز"><i>بز</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ترجمه"><i>ترجمه</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کمونیست"><i>کمونیست</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جنگ"><i>جنگ</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تکه"><i>تکه</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ماهی"><i>ماهی</i><par n="ماهی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جوان"><i>جوان</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جستار"><i>جستار</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شعر"><i>شعر</i><par n="شعر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جمهوری"><i>جمهوری</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چشم"><i>چشم</i><par n="دختر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خواننده"><i>خوانند</i><par n="فرشت/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شاه"><i>شاه</i><par n="دختر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="زمستان"><i>زمستان</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فرانسوی"><i>فرانسوی</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مرده"><i>مرده</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ایل"><i>ایل</i><par n="ایل__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پرنده"><i>پرند</i><par n="فرشت/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شاهد"><i>شاهد</i><par n="دختر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ویتامین"><i>ویتامین</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ازبکستان"><i>ازبکستان</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="آفریقای مرکزی"><i>آفریقای<b/>مرکزی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="آنتیگوا و باربودا"><i>آنتیگوا<b/>و<b/>باربودا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ایران"><i>ایران</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="بریتانیا"><i>بریتانیا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="بوتسوانا"><i>بوتسوانا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ترکمنستان"><i>ترکمنستان</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="چاد"><i>چاد</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="سنگاپور"><i>سنگاپور</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="غنا"><i>غنا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کستاریکا"><i>کستاریکا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="گینه"><i>گینه</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="مالدیو"><i>مالدیو</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="نائورو"><i>نائورو</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="یمن"><i>یمن</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="آره"><i>آره</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اخیراً"><i>اخیراً</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="البته"><i>البته</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اینجا"><i>اینجا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بسیار"><i>بسیار</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="تند"><i>تند</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="حالا"><i>حالا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="خیلی"><i>خیلی</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="دیر"><i>دیر</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="فردا"><i>فردا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="معمولا"><i>معمولا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="نخیر"><i>نخیر</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="هم"><i>هم</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="والله"><i>والله</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کی"><i>کی</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="متجاوز"><i>متجاوز</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="اشکار"><i>اشکار</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سفید"><i>سفید</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="دگرگون"><i>دگرگون</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پست"><i>پست</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ستمگر"><i>ستمگر</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="فدایی"><i>فدایی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="روان"><i>روان</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="حاملگی"><i>حاملگی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="قاطع"><i>قاطع</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="مجانی"><i>مجانی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="قابل"><i>قابل</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سخت"><i>سخت</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="یخی"><i>یخی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
